Virginia statutes. Title 36. Housing.
Chapter 1.4. Low-Income Housing Credit.

§ 36-55.63.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 305, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

36-55.63

, relating to low-income housing credit, was derived from Acts 1989, c. 280; 1990, c. 830; 1992, cc. 325, 347, 754; 1994, c. 611; 1996, cc. 580, 826; 2001, cc. 293, 299; 2007, c. 778; 2010, cc. 520, 608.

Acts 2016, c. 305, cl. 3 provides: “That this act shall in no way alter or affect any (i) tax credit or tax benefit or other tax attribute allowed or earned under any section repealed by this act or (ii) tax liability or obligation pursuant to any such section.”